src/morphology/stems/new_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBS
                VAI_GET ; !VAIs never take third person prefix, but a deverbal noun or a VAI in a V-N compound might -> check is applied when inflectional suffixes start
                VII_GET ;
                VAIO ; 
                TRANS_GET ;

LEXICON VAI_GET
    VAI ;

LEXICON VII_GET
    VII ; 

LEXICON TRANS_GET
    VTA ; 
    VTI ;

LEXICON VAI_TAG
+VAI:0  VAI_DERIV_GATEWAY ; 

LEXICON VAIO
maamiijin    VAIO_TAG    " 1 snack away on sth." ; !Rand key:n58fa1bddeb9c4f9bbc4923320a01dd02n
znigiingwen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 rub something on one’s face, use something as a face cream" ; !Rand key:n103000789390n
znagiingwen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 rub something on one’s face, use something as a face cream " ; !Rand key:n103000789324n
znag'iinan    VAIO_TAG    " 1 struggle with something [manipulable by hand]" ; !Rand key:n103000789306n
ziind'agen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 use something to chink" ; !Rand key:n103000788866n
ziigniboojgen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 spray a certain substance, spray things with a certain substance" ; !Rand key:n103000788666n
ziigna'on    VAIO_TAG    " 1 administer drops in one’s eyes" ; !Rand key:n103000788629n
zigzisnan    VAIO_TAG    " 1 have smb. as one’s mother-in-law" ; !Rand key:n103000788318n
zhinoomaagen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 show something to people" ; !Rand key:n103000787590n
zhegiiwed'amaagen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 return sth. to its owner, take sth. back to its owner," ; !Rand key:n103000779522n
zesesaapnen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 cry from the pain in a part of one’s body" ; !Rand key:n103000770214n
wiikwendbepzan    VAIO_TAG    " 1 use something as a bandana for one’s head, use something as a kerchief, wrap something around one’s head" ; !Rand key:n103000757028n
waabnda'wen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 exhibit something, show something" ; !Rand key:n103000746234n
shkodaawen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 have sth. remain unsold" ; !Rand key:n103000744618n
shangen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 serve something to people" ; !Rand key:n103004168028n
pigdigweshnan    VAIO_TAG    " 1 use something as a kneeling pad" ; !Rand key:n103004167106n
paabkin'gen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 use something as a potholder" ; !Rand key:n103004166626n
npataagen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 bet sth., wager sth." ; !Rand key:n103004165306n
noodsen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 grab something [at rest]" ; !Rand key:n103000713733n
naadaagen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 get stuff for people" ; !Rand key:n103000695209n
mmeskwaabnda'wen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 flaunt something, show off something" ; !Rand key:n103000679695n
mdognagen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 use something [sheetlike] to cover something " ; !Rand key:n103000677464n
mandoomin    VAIO_TAG    " 1 hate something, regard something as one’s enemy" ; !Rand key:n103000660309n
maandgon'agen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 use something [sheetlike] to cover something" ; !Rand key:n103000660003n
kakzhe-bwen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 roast something over coals" ; !Rand key:n103000658250n
gwan'on    VAIO_TAG    " 1 cover up with something" ; !Rand key:n103000642701n
giiwnaadaapnen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 be driven crazy by pain, go crazy from pain [in a part of the body]" ; !Rand key:n103000606608n
dbendmookaazan    VAIO_TAG    " 1 act like something belongs to one, pretend one owns something" ; !Rand key:n103004115954n
daapnamaagen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 take something belonging to someone else, take something for someone else, accept something" ; !Rand key:n103004115463n
bskaabwidaagen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 take sth. back to its owner, take sth. back for someone" ; !Rand key:n103004114557n
bnangaagwinan    VAIO_TAG    " 1 use sth. as eyedrops [on oneself]" ; !Rand key:n102996027175n
biigbidmookiin    VAIO_TAG    " 1 get someone to tear down something" ; !Rand key:n102995997855n
biigbidmaagen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 break something belonging to someone else [with the hands]" ; !Rand key:n102995997846n
bgijnezin    VAIO_TAG    " 1 have pain subside in a part of one’s body, have a part of one’s body stop hurting, have the pain in a part of one’s body stop" ; !Rand key:n102995994101n
mgoshkaadnezin    VAIO_TAG    " 1 be bothered by an ache in a part of one’s body, be bothered by a pain in a part of one’s body" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdfbe244b82a31c23320a01dd02n
madnezin    VAIO_TAG    " 1 awaken from pain in a part of one’s body, be woken by pain in a part of one’s body, wake up with a part of one’s body hurting" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bde62344a25adc823320a01dd02n
noojmon    VAIO_TAG    " 1 a certain part of one's body heal, have a certain body part heal" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdc6b8c484bb20523320a01dd02n
ndamnamaagen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 tie up something of somebody’s" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bda6c044325b7bb23320a01dd02n
nda-daawen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 put sth. up for sale, look tot sell sth., look for a buyer for sth." ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdaf410425e8fb523320a01dd02n
taasan    VAIO_TAG    " 1 use something as a shelf" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd6ee384cbbb40623320a01dd02n
shooyiingwen    VAIO_TAG    " 1 rub something on one’s face" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd65cfc40a3b0c423320a01dd02n
shoodendmaadzan    VAIO_TAG    " 1 imagine oneself to be somebody’s girlfriend" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd6478c4fe2a37023320a01dd02n

LEXICON VAIO_TAG
+VAIO:0 VAIO_ORDERS_GET ; 

LEXICON VII_TAG
+VII:0  VII_DERIV_GATEWAY ; 

LEXICON VTA_TAG
+VTA:0  VTA_DETRANSITIVE_GATEWAY ;

LEXICON VTI_AM_THEME 
+VTI:am1  VTI_ORDERS_GET ;
+VTI:0  VTI_BASE_DERIV ;

LEXICON VTI_OO_THEME 
+VTI:oo   VTI_ORDERS_GET ;
+VTI:0  VTI_BASE_DERIV ;

LEXICON VAI
zhigaadese    VAI_TAG    " 1 one’s leg move involuntarily in a certain way, jerk one’s leg towards or from a certain object, kick one’s leg in a certain direction" ; !Rand key:n103000780153n
zaagewaakdaabaan'go    VAI_TAG    " 1 emerge riding [in a vehicle] from the woods, emerge from the woods driving a vehicle" ; !Rand key:n103000768656n
wezhshin    VAI_TAG    " 1 lie down" ; !Rand key:n103000756659n
waaswaakwo'ge    VAI_TAG    " 1 blaze trees" ; !Rand key:n103000755808n
pegjiin'ge    VAI_TAG    " 1 keep cards that one can peg with in cribbage" ; !Rand key:n103004167068n
nnepaadkizne    VAI_TAG    " 1 have one’s shoes on the wrong way, put one’s shoes on the wrong way, wear one’s shoes the wrong way" ; !Rand key:n103000713378n
nakzhawe    VAI_TAG    " 1 paddle in a certain direction, paddle to a certain place, row in a certain direction, row to a certain place" ; !Rand key:n103000696340n
maanjii    VAI_TAG    " 1 be left-handed" ; !Rand key:n103000660016n
gndaajiishkwegmitoo    VAI_TAG    " 1 wallow (in literal sense)" ; !Rand key:n103000619319n
dbasoon'gizi    VAI_TAG    " 1 [vehicle] be low in height" ; !Rand key:n103004115933n
bbaa-zhezhegaandnige    VAI_TAG    " 1 dance a waltz" ; !Rand key:n102995953525n
nnaawdaabaan'ke    VAI_TAG    " 1 fix a car, repair a car" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdbfbf449ef9ceb23320a01dd02n
shkikaa    VAI_TAG    " 1 change direction in walking, turn and walk in another direction" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd566f447e2adf323320a01dd02n
LEXICON VII
zgaakdin    VII_TAG    " 1 be snagged on something" ; !Rand key:n103000770314n
waakaawaangeyaa    VII_TAG    " 1 [hat] have a brim" ; !Rand key:n103000746481n
nshanaaznaagot:nshanaaznaagod2    VII_TAG    " 1 [structure] look neglected, look in poor shape [from neglect]" ; !Rand key:n103004165766n
n'kweyaajwan    VII_TAG    " 1 a river join another, be a tributary" ; !Rand key:n103000694945n
miignasin    VII_TAG    " 1 grow feathery-looking mold" ; !Rand key:n103000678215n
gzhiiyaanmad    VII_TAG    " 1 [wind] blow fast" ; !Rand key:n103000643829n
gdagdamo    VII_TAG    " 1 [road] be bumpy" ; !Rand key:n103000564712n
daashkaabkishkaa    VII_TAG    " 1 [rock] cleave over time, crack in two over time" ; !Rand key:n103004115499n
biinaagmishkaa    VII_TAG    " 1 [body of water] turn clear" ; !Rand key:n102996003216n
kojgamde    VII_TAG    " 1 foam up [in boiling]" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdd741442f1a87423320a01dd02n
shpaakdoondneyaa    VII_TAG    " 1 be high-heeled, have high heels" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd674ec42cf85ce23320a01dd02n
LEXICON VTA
zgidyebnaa:zgidyebn   VTA_TAG    " 1 grab smb. by the bum" ; !Rand key:n103000770536n
wiisgaapnanaa:wiisgaapnan   VTA_TAG    " 1 give smb. a painful beating" ; !Rand key:n103000757347n
piitnawaa:piitnaw   VTA_TAG    " 1 be ahead of smb. by a certain score, beat smb. by a certain score" ; !Rand key:n103004167294n
naadoodegzii'aa:naadoodegzii'   VTA_TAG    " 1 go get belongings for smb. [who’s moving back], go get smb. moving from some place, move smb. back to some place to reside" ; !Rand key:n103000695273n
miiwebnaa:miiwebn   VTA_TAG    " 1 shove sth. (an.) out of the way [with one’s hands]" ; !Rand key:n103000678668n
gziijiiwaa:gziijiiw   VTA_TAG    " 1 wipe sth. (an.) [3-dimensional]" ; !Rand key:n103000644002n
gdogjiiwebshkawaa:gdogjiiwebshkaw   VTA_TAG    " 1 tip sth. (an.) over [with one’s weight], roll sth. (an.) over [with one’s weight]" ; !Rand key:n103000568231n
bsimaa:bsim   VTA_TAG    " 1 make insinuations about smb., make innuendoes about smb., slight smb. through innuendoes" ; !Rand key:n103004114464n
bganzmaa:bganzm   VTA_TAG    " 1 belittle smb., deride smb." ; !Rand key:n102995992687n
mboostwi'aa:mboostwi'   VTA_TAG    " 1 boost sth. (an.) (of vehicles)" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bde94ec4a63956323320a01dd02n
mjwebnaa:mjwebn   VTA_TAG    " 1 throw sth. (an.) down from an elevated location" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd7fc4c4f13826523320a01dd02n
LEXICON VTI
zhgajiikaan:zhgajiik   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 tire of working on sth." ; !Rand key:n103000779922n
zaamaagmizaan:zaamaagmiz   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 overheat sth. (a liquid)" ; !Rand key:n103000769084n
wiikwaasdoon:wiikwaasd   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 suck sth. up [with a machine], vacuum sth. up" ; !Rand key:n103000756944n
shoodaakwebshkaan:shoodaakwebshk   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 push sth. against something [with one’s weight] so it’s flush against it" ; !Rand key:n103000744778n
shigjiibdoon:shigjiibd   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 crumble sth., crush sth. to pieces [with one’s hands]" ; !Rand key:n103000744064n
niigaanaaddaan:niigaanaadd   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 foretell sth., prophesy sth." ; !Rand key:n103000711917n
ni'gaadoon:ni'gaad   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 forget where one has hidden sth." ; !Rand key:n103000711656n
mzinaakshkoodoon:mzinaakshkood   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 imprint a design into sth. [with an instrument], imprint sth. with a design [with an instrument], stamp a design into sth. [with a die or similar instrument], stamp a design of sth. into a surface" ; !Rand key:n103000694457n
mno-daapnaan:mno-daapn   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 accept sth. graciously, accept sth. stressful with equanimity" ; !Rand key:n103000680399n
jiichiigndaan:jiichiignd   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 gnaw on sth." ; !Rand key:n103000644958n
gyaksidoon:gyaksid   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 adjust the position of sth., put sth. in its proper place, straighten sth. out [by moving it]" ; !Rand key:n103000643580n
giishkgaadeboodoon:giishkgaadebood   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 cut the legs off of sth." ; !Rand key:n103000599416n
gbizhe'aan:gbizhe'   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 close the stove air vent" ; !Rand key:n103004118992n
daataangwewesdoon:daataangwewesd   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 tinkle a bell" ; !Rand key:n103004115703n
bmiikaan:bmiik   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 attend to sth." ; !Rand key:n102996023092n
biigwaasdoon:biigwaasd   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 break sth. [mechanical] from operating it too roughly, break sth. from overuse" ; !Rand key:n102995998910n
aabskwaakwaan:aabskwaakw   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 remove sth. that’s bolted onto something" ; !Rand key:n102995923868n
aaboojiigbidoon:aaboojiigbid   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 turn sth. [made of cloth] inside out" ; !Rand key:n102995921979n
jaachiingwewesdoon:jaachiingwewesd   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 tinkle a bell intermittently" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdc663c4578a79023320a01dd02n
niisaakiiyedaabaadaan:niisaakiiyedaabaad   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 transport sth. down a hill" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdb38c04046ae6a23320a01dd02n
mookiibdoon:mookiibd   VTI_OO_THEME    " 1 pull sth. out into view" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd89a584249816623320a01dd02n
piitendaan:piitend   VTI_AM_THEME    " 1 hold sth. in a certain regard" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd5c9284cc3b81323320a01dd02n
